Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB125.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 186.403 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Transportation Cabinet shall develop a system of issuing voluntary travel ID
instruction permits, operator's licenses, commercial driver's licenses, and personal
identification cards.
(2) The development of the system identified in subsection (1) of this section shall
include but not be limited to the:
(a) Acquisition of equipment and information technology systems and services;
(b) Modification, conversion, or upgrade of the cabinet's existing databases,
equipment, and information technology systems;
(c) Establishment of electronic connectivity with any other state's driver licensing
department, federal agency, national or regional association, or business.
Electronic connectivity under this paragraph shall be limited to the sharing of
the minimum amount of information necessary to validate information
supplied by an applicant, process the application, and produce and distribute
the identity document. The Transportation Cabinet shall limit any access to
the databases developed under this chapter in accordance with the Driver's
Privacy Protection Act, 18 U.S.C. sec. 2721;
(d) Creation of a new design for operator's licenses, commercial driver's licenses,
instruction permits, and personal identification cards that will meet the
minimum content, design, and security standards required under this section;
(e) Collection, management, and retention of personal information and identity
documents; and
(f) Development and implementation of a comprehensive security plan to ensure
the security and integrity of the department's:
1. Employees;
Page 1 of 16
XXXX 2/10/2025 10:43 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1502
2. Facilities;
3. Storage systems;
4. Production of operator's licenses, commercial driver's licenses,
instruction permits, and personal identification cards; and
5. Collection and retention of personal information and identity
documents.
(3) A person who[On or after January 1, 2019]:
(a) [A person who ]Applies for an initial Kentucky instruction permit, operator's
license, or personal identification card under KRS 186.412 or[, 186.4121,]
186.4122[, or 186.4123], including any person who establishes residency in
the state, may apply for either a voluntary travel ID or a standard instruction
permit, operator's license, or personal identification card;
(b) [A person who ]Applies for the renewal of an instruction permit, operator's
license, or personal identification card under KRS 186.412, 186.4121,
186.4122, or 186.4123 may apply for either a voluntary travel ID or a
standard instruction permit, operator's license, or personal identification card;
(c) 1. Meets the minimum requirements for federal recognition in Section
202 of the REAL ID Act of 2005, as amended, in 49 U.S.C. sec. 30301
note;
2. Has been admitted to the United States as a nonimmigrant pursuant to
a compact of free association between the United States and the
Republic of the Marshall Island, the Republic of Palau, or the
Federated States of Micronesia; and
3. Applies for an initial or renewal operator's license or personal
identification card under Section 2 or 4 of this Act;
May apply for either a voluntary travel ID or a standard instruction permit,
operator's license, or personal identification card; and
Page 2 of 16
XXXX 2/10/2025 10:43 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1502
(d) [(c) A person who ]Holds a voluntary travel ID operator's license, and
applies for and passes all necessary examinations for a commercial driver's
license under KRS Chapter 281A, shall receive a voluntary travel ID
commercial driver's license. This paragraph shall not apply to a person who is
not a citizen or permanent resident of the United States.
(4) The fees for initial, renewal, duplicate, or corrected voluntary travel ID or standard
operator's licenses, instruction permits, or personal identification cards shall be as
set forth under KRS 186.531.
(5) A voluntary travel ID identity document issued by the cabinet may be used for all
state purposes authorized for identity documents otherwise issued under KRS
186.400 to 186.640 and Chapter 281A.
(6) The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations under KRS
Chapter 13A that set standards for the establishment of a voluntary travel ID
identity document system, including but not limited to the components of the
system identified in subsection (2) of this section.
Section 2. KRS 186.412 (Effective July 1, 2025) is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "applicant" means a person who:
(a) Is a citizen or permanent resident of the United States; or
(b) Meets the minimum requirements for federal recognition in Section 202 of
the REAL ID Act of 2005, as amended, in 49 U.S.C. sec. 30301 note, and
has been admitted to the United States as a nonimmigrant pursuant to a
compact of free association between the United States and the Republic of
the Marshall Island, the Republic of Palau, or the Federated States of
Micronesia.
(2) An applicant shall apply for an instruction permit or operator's license with the
Transportation Cabinet, or through alternative technology. Except as provided in
KRS 186.417, the application form shall require the applicant's:
Page 3 of 16
XXXX 2/10/2025 10:43 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1502
(a) Full legal name and signature;
(b) Date of birth;
(c) Social Security number or a letter from the Social Security Administration
declining to issue a Social Security number;
(d) Sex;
(e) Present Kentucky resident address, exclusive of a post office box address
alone;
(f) Other information necessary to permit the application of United States citizens
to also serve as an application for voter registration;
(g) A brief physical description of the applicant;
(h) Proof of the applicant's Kentucky residency, including but not limited to a
deed or property tax bill, utility agreement or utility bill, or rental housing
agreement; and
(i) Other information the cabinet may require by administrative regulation
promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A.
(3) (a) To satisfy the requirements of subsection (2)(e) and (h) of this section, an
applicant seeking to obtain a renewal or duplicate operator's license may use a
completed form attesting to the lack of an established and fixed nighttime
residence of regular return as established in accordance with paragraph (b) of
this subsection. The form developed under paragraph (b) of this subsection
shall not be used by an applicant for an initial operator's license or instruction
permit.
(b) The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A to develop forms and procedures whereby an applicant for
a renewal or duplicate operator's license under this section or KRS 186.4121,
or an applicant for an initial, renewal, or duplicate personal identification card
under KRS 186.4122 or 186.4123, who does not have an established and fixed
Page 4 of 16
XXXX 2/10/2025 10:43 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1502
nighttime residence of regular return may use as proof of residency, a form,
attested to by a homeless shelter, health care facility, or social service agency
currently providing the applicant treatment or services, that the applicant is a
resident of Kentucky. An applicant who does not have an established and
fixed nighttime residence of regular return shall not be issued a voluntary
travel ID operator's license under this section or KRS 186.4121.
(4) In addition to the information identified in subsection (2) of this section:[,]
(a) A permanent resident shall present one (1) of the following documents issued
by the United States Department of Homeland Security, United States Bureau
of Citizenship and Immigration Services:
1.[(a)] An I-551 card with a photograph of the applicant; or
2.[(b)] A form with the photograph of the applicant or a passport with a
photograph of the applicant on which the United States Department of
Homeland Security, United States Bureau of Citizenship and
Immigration Services, has stamped the following: "Processed for I-551.
Temporary evidence of lawful admission for permanent residence. Valid
until .... (Expiration Date). Employment authorized."
(b) An applicant as defined in subsection (1)(b) of this section shall present a
valid, unexpired passport from his or her country of origin, along with one
(1) of the following documents issued by the United States Department of
Homeland Security, United States Bureau of Citizenship and Immigration
Services:
1. Form I-94, Arrival/Departure Record number;
2. Form I-766, Employment Authorization Document number; or
3. Form I-797, Notice of Action receipt number.
(5) Upon application for an operator's license under this section, the cabinet shall
capture a photograph of the applicant in accordance with the requirements of KRS
Page 5 of 16
XXXX 2/10/2025 10:43 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1502
186.4102(1).
(6) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the cabinet shall
electronically scan the documents required for application under this section
and shall electronically retain the application, supporting documents, and the
photograph of the applicant. Upon completion of any required examinations
under KRS 186.480, the cabinet shall present the applicant with a temporary
operator's license or instruction permit, which shall be valid for thirty (30)
days until a permanent operator's license or instruction permit is mailed to the
applicant by the Transportation Cabinet.
(b) The cabinet shall only electronically scan the birth certificate of an individual
applying for a voluntary travel ID instruction permit or operator's license. If
the applicant is not seeking such a permit or license, the cabinet shall not
electronically scan the applicant's birth certificate.
(c) An applicant for an operator's license or instruction permit shall not be
required to surrender the applicant's birth certificate for image capture, image
storage, or image transmission to any entity, including the federal
government, unless express consent is given by the applicant during the
course of obtaining a voluntary travel ID license or permit.
(7) An applicant shall swear an oath to the cabinet as to the truthfulness of the
statements contained in the form.
Section 3. KRS 186.4121 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "applicant" means a person who:
(a) Is not a United States citizen;
(b) [ and ]Has not been granted status as a permanent resident of the United
States; and
(c) Does not meet the Meet the minimum requirements for federal recognition
in Section 202 of the REAL ID Act of 2005, as amended, in 49 U.S.C. sec.
Page 6 of 16
XXXX 2/10/2025 10:43 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1502
30301 note, and has not been admitted to the United States as a
nonimmigrant pursuant to a compact of free association between the United
States and the Republic of the Marshall Island, the Republic of Palau, or
the Federated States of Micronesia.
(2) An applicant shall apply for an instruction permit or operator's license to either the
Transportation Cabinet in Frankfort or a Transportation Cabinet field office. An
applicant under this section shall complete the application identified in KRS
186.412, along with other documents required under this section. The cabinet shall
keep an electronic copy of the documentation submitted with the application and
shall capture a photograph of the applicant in accordance with KRS 186.4102(1)
(3) The application form under this section shall be accompanied by the applicant's
documentation issued by the United States Department of Homeland Security,
United States Bureau of Citizenship and Immigration Services, authorizing the
person to be in the United States and, if applicable, the applicant's international
driving permit. The Transportation Cabinet shall verify the information submitted
under this subsection through the Systematic Alien Verification for Entitlements
(SAVE) program.
(4) The application form of a special status individual with a K-1 status shall be
accompanied by an original or certified copy of the applicant's completed marriage
license signed by the official who presided over the marriage ceremony and two (2)
witnesses. The application form of a special status individual with a K-1 status shall
also include the applicant's petition to enter the United States for the purpose of
marriage that contains the name of the prospective spouse. If the name of the
prospective spouse on the petition does not match the name of the spouse on the
marriage license, the Transportation Cabinet shall not be required to issue an
operator's license.
(5) (a) The Transportation Cabinet shall verify and validate the immigration status
Page 7 of 16
XXXX 2/10/2025 10:43 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1502
and personal identity of an applicant under this section through federal
government systems and databases.
(b) If an applicant's identity and immigration status is validated, the cabinet shall
capture a photograph of the applicant, and scan the required documents into
the cabinet's database.
(c) If the applicant successfully completes any examinations required under KRS
186.480, or if an examination is not required, the Transportation Cabinet shall
present the applicant with a temporary operator's license or instruction permit,
which shall be valid for thirty (30) days until a permanent operator's license or
instruction permit is mailed to the applicant.
(d) An applicant under this section shall only be issued a standard operator's
license or instruction permit.
(6) (a) An applicant shall apply to renew an operator's license, or obtain a duplicate
operator's license, at the Transportation Cabinet in Frankfort or a
Transportation Cabinet field office.
(b) If an applicant has any type of change in his or her immigration status, the
applicant shall apply to update the operator's license with either the
Transportation Cabinet in Frankfort or a Transportation Cabinet field office
within ten (10) days.
(7) An applicant shall swear an oath to the Transportation Cabinet as to the truthfulness
of the statements contained in the form.
(8) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, an initial or renewal
operator's license issued to an applicant who is not a special status individual
shall be valid for a period equal to the length of time the applicant's
documentation from the United States Department of Homeland Security,
United States Bureau of Citizenship and Immigration Services, is valid, or
eight (8) years, whichever time period is shorter.
Page 8 of 16
XXXX 2/10/2025 10:43 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1502
(b) An initial or renewal operator's license shall be valid for a period of one (1)
year if the applicant is not a special status individual and the person's
documentation issued by the United States Department of Homeland Security,
United States Bureau of Citizenship and Immigration Services, is issued for
an indefinite period of time and does not have an expiration date. The fee
shall be the same as for a regular operator's license.
Section 4. KRS 186.4122 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "applicant" means a person who:
(a) Is a citizen or permanent resident of the United States; or
(b) Meets the minimum requirements for federal recognition in section 202 of
the REAL ID Act of 2005, as amended in 49 U.S.C. sec. 30301 note, and has
been admitted to the United States as a nonimmigrant pursuant to a
compact of Free Association between the United States and the Republic of
the Marshall Island, the Republic of Palau, or the Federated States of
Micronesia.
(2) The Transportation Cabinet shall issue a personal identification card to an applicant
who:
(a) Is a Kentucky resident;
(b) Applies in person to the cabinet or through alternative technology; and
(c) Complies with the provisions of this section.
(3) Upon application for a personal identification card under this section, the cabinet
shall capture a photograph of the applicant in accordance with KRS 186.4102(1).
(4) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the cabinet shall
electronically scan the documents required for application under this section
and shall electronically retain the application, supporting documents, and the
photograph of the applicant. The cabinet shall present the applicant with a
temporary personal identification card, which shall be valid for thirty (30)
Page 9 of 16
XXXX 2/10/2025 10:43 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1502
days until a permanent personal identification card is mailed to the applicant
by the Transportation Cabinet.
(b) The cabinet shall only electronically scan the birth certificate of an individual
applying for a voluntary travel ID personal identification card. If the applicant
is not seeking such a document, the cabinet shall not electronically scan the
applicant's birth certificate.
(c) An applicant for a personal identification card shall not be required to
surrender the applicant's birth certificate for image capture, image storage, or
image transmission to any entity, including the federal government, unless
express consent is given by the applicant during the course of obtaining a
voluntary travel ID personal identification card.
(5) (a) An application for a personal identification card shall be accompanied by the
same information as is required for an operator's license under KRS 186.412,
except if an applicant does not have an established and fixed nighttime
residence of regular return, the applicant may:
1. Until July 1, 2025, use as proof of residency a signed letter from a
homeless shelter, health care facility, or social service agency currently
providing the applicant treatment or services and attesting that the
applicant is a resident of Kentucky; or
2. On or after July 1, 2025, follow the procedures outlined in KRS
186.412(3).
(b) An applicant who does not have an established and fixed nighttime residence
of regular return shall not be issued a voluntary travel ID personal
identification card.
(c) An applicant for a personal identification card who is at least sixteen (16)
years of age but less than eighteen (18) years of age shall not be required to
obtain a signature of a parent or legal guardian on the application if the
Page 10 of 16
XXXX 2/10/2025 10:43 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1502
applicant has been verified as a homeless child or youth, as defined in 42
U.S.C. sec. 11434a(2), by at least one (1) of the following:
1. A director or designee of a governmental or nonprofit agency that
receives public or private funding to provide services to homeless
people;
2. A local educational agency liaison for homeless children and youths
designated pursuant to 42 U.S.C. sec. 11432(g)(1)(J)(ii), or a school
social worker or school counselor;
3. The director or director's designee of a federal TRIO Program or a
Gaining Early Awareness and Readiness for Undergraduate Program; or
4. A financial aid administrator for an institution of higher education.
(d) It shall be permissible for the application form for a personal identification
card to include as an applicant's most current resident address a mailing
address or an address provided on a voter registration card.
(e) If the applicant is not the legal owner or possessor of the address provided on
the application form, the applicant shall swear that he or she has permission
from the legal owner, authorized agent for the legal owner, or possessor to use
the address for purposes of obtaining the personal identification card.
(6) (a) Every applicant for a personal identification card under this section shall
swear an oath to the cabinet as to the truthfulness of the statements contained
on the application form.
(b) A personal identification card may be suspended or revoked if the person who
was issued the card presents false or misleading information to the cabinet
when applying for the card.
(7) A personal identification card issued under this section shall be valid for a period of
eight (8) years from the date of issuance, except that if the personal identification
card is issued to a person who does not have an established and fixed nighttime
Page 11 of 16
XXXX 2/10/2025 10:43 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1502
residence of regular return, then the personal identification card shall be valid for
one (1) year from the date of issuance.
(8) (a) An applicant shall not be issued a personal identification card if the applicant
currently holds a valid Kentucky instruction permit or operator's license. A
person shall not hold more than one (1) license or personal identification card.
(b) If a person's instruction permit or operator's license has been suspended or
revoked, the person may be issued a personal identification card. A personal
identification card shall be surrendered when the person applies to have his or
her instruction permit or operator's license reinstated.
Section 5. KRS 186.4123 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "applicant" means a person who:
(a) Is not a United States citizen;
(b) [ and ]Has not been granted status as a permanent resident of the United
States; and
(c) Does not meet the minimum requirements for federal recognition in Section
202 of REAL ID Act of 2005, as amended in 49 U.S.C. sec. 30301 note, and
has not been admitted to the United States as a nonimmigrant pursuant to a
compact of Free Association between the United States and the Republic of
the Marshall Island, the Republic of Palau, or the Federated States of
Micronesia.
(2) The Transportation Cabinet shall issue a personal identification card to an applicant
who:
(a) Is a Kentucky resident;
(b) Applies in person to either the Transportation Cabinet in Frankfort or a
Transportation Cabinet field office; and
(c) Complies with the provisions of this section.
(3) Upon application for a personal identification card under this section, the cabinet
Page 12 of 16
XXXX 2/10/2025 10:43 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1502
shall capture a photograph of the applicant in accordance with KRS 186.4102(1).
(4) The cabinet shall electronically scan the documents required for application under
this section, supporting documents, and the photograph of the applicant into the
cabinet's database.
(5) (a) An application for a personal identification card shall be accompanied by the
same information as is required for an operator's license under KRS 186.412,
along with other documents required under this section, except if an applicant
does not have an established and fixed nighttime residence of regular return,
the applicant may:
1. Until July 1, 2025, use as proof of residency a signed letter from a
homeless shelter, health care facility, or social service agency currently
providing the applicant treatment or services and attesting that the
applicant is a resident of Kentucky; or
2. On or after July 1, 2025, follow the procedures outlined in KRS
186.412(3).
(b) An applicant who does not have an established and fixed nighttime residence
of regular return shall not be issued a voluntary travel ID personal
identification card.
(c) It shall be permissible for the application form for a personal identification
card to include as an applicant's most current resident address a mailing
address or an address provided on a voter registration card.
(d) If the applicant is not the legal owner or possessor of the address provided on
the application form, the applicant shall swear that he or she has permission
from the legal owner, authorized agent for the legal owner, or possessor to use
the address for purposes of obtaining the personal identification card.
(6) The application form under this section shall be accompanied by the applicant's
documentation issued by the United States Department of Homeland Security,
Page 13 of 16
XXXX 2/10/2025 10:43 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1502
United States Bureau of Citizenship and Immigration Services, authorizing the
applicant to be in the United States. The Transportation Cabinet shall verify the
information submitted under this subsection through the Systematic Alien
Verification for Entitlements (SAVE) program.
(7) The application form of a special status individual with a K-1 status shall be
accompanied by an original or certified copy of the applicant's completed marriage
license signed by the official who presided over the marriage ceremony and two (2)
witnesses. The application form of a special status individual with a K-1 status shall
also include the applicant's petition to enter the United States for the purpose of
marriage that contains the name of the prospective spouse. If the name of the
prospective spouse on the petition does not match the name of the spouse on the
marriage license, the Transportation Cabinet shall not be required to issue an
operator's license.
(8) (a) The Transportation Cabinet shall verify and validate the immigration status
and personal identity of an applicant under this section through federal
government systems and databases.
(b) If an applicant's identity and immigration status is validated, the cabinet shall
capture a photograph of the applicant, scan the required documents into the
cabinet's database, and present the applicant with a temporary personal
identification card, which shall be valid for thirty (30) days until a permanent
personal identification card is mailed to the applicant.
(c) An applicant under this section shall only be issued a standard personal
identification card.
(9) (a) An applicant shall apply to renew a personal identification card, or obtain a
duplicate personal identification card, at the Transportation Cabinet in
Frankfort or a Transportation Cabinet field office.
(b) If a person has any type of change in his or her immigration status, the person
Page 14 of 16
XXXX 2/10/2025 10:43 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1502
shall apply to update with either the Transportation Cabinet in Frankfort or a
Transportation Cabinet field office within ten (10) days.
(10) (a) Every applicant for a personal identification card under this section shall
swear an oath to the Transportation Cabinet as to the truthfulness of the
statements contained on the application form.
(b) A personal identification card may be suspended or revoked if the person who
was issued the card presents false or misleading information to the cabinet
when applying for the card.
(11) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, an initial or renewal
personal identification card issued to an applicant who is not a special status
individual shall be valid for a period equal to the length of time the applicant's
documentation from the United States Department of Homeland Security,
United States Bureau of Citizenship and Immigration Services, is valid, or
eight (8) years, whichever time period is shorter.
(b) A personal identification card shall be valid for a period of one (1) year if:
1. The applicant is not a special status individual and the applicant's
documentation issued by the United States Department of Homeland
Security, United States Bureau of Citizenship and Immigration Services,
is issued for an indefinite period of time and does not have an expiration
date. The fee shall be the same as for a regular personal identification
card; or
2. The personal identification card is issued to a person who does not have
an established and fixed nighttime residence of regular return.
Section 6. KRS 186.4125 is amended to read as follows:
In order to apply for a voluntary travel ID identity document under KRS 186.403, the
applicant shall present:
(1) The applicant's certified birth certificate;
Page 15 of 16
XXXX 2/10/2025 10:43 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1502
(2) [or ]A valid, unexpired, United States passport or Permanent Resident Card (Form
I-551); or
(3) A valid, unexpired passport from his or her country of origin, along with one (1)
of the following documents issued by the United States Department of Homeland
Security, United States Bureau of Citizenship and Immigration Services:
(a) Form I-94, Arrival/Departure Record number;
(b) Form I-766, Employment Authorization Document number; or
(c) Form I-797, Notice of Action receipt number;
if he or she is an applicant as defined in subsection (1) (b) of section 2 of this Act.
Section 7. This Act takes effect July 1, 2025.
Page 16 of 16
XXXX 2/10/2025 10:43 AM Jacketed